Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 2 Redevelopment
13-20-209. Conservation and rehabilitation by private enterprise — Findings.

It is hereby found and declared that:

There exist in municipalities of the state slum, blighted, and deteriorated areas which constitute a serious and growing menace, injurious to the public health, safety, morals and welfare of the residents of the state, and the findings and declarations made in § 13-20-201 with respect to slum and blighted areas are hereby affirmed and restated;

Certain slum, blighted, or deteriorated areas, or portions thereof, may require acquisitions and clearance, as provided in this part, since the prevailing condition of decay may make impracticable the reclamation of the area by conservation or rehabilitation, but other areas or portions thereof may, through the means provided in this part, be susceptible of conservation or rehabilitation in such a manner that the conditions and evils hereinbefore enumerated may be eliminated, remedied or prevented, and, to the extent feasible, salvable slum and blighted areas should be conserved and rehabilitated through voluntary action and the regulatory process; and

All powers conferred by this part are for public uses and purposes for which public money may be expended and such other powers exercised, and the necessity in the public interest for this part is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.

A municipality, to the greatest extent it determines to be feasible in carrying out this part, shall afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the sound needs of the municipality as a whole, to the rehabilitation or redevelopment of areas by private enterprise.

Acts 1955, ch. 181, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-821.

Cross-References. Findings regarding slums and blighted areas affirmed, § 13-20-301.

13-20-210. Urban renewal projects — Extent of rehabilitation.

In addition to its authority under any other section of this part, an authority is hereby authorized to plan and undertake urban renewal projects. As used in this part, an urban renewal project may include undertakings and activities for the elimination, and for the prevention of the development or spread, of slums or blighted, deteriorated, or deteriorating areas, and may involve any work or undertaking for such purpose constituting a redevelopment project of any rehabilitation or conservation work, or any combination of such undertaking or work. For this purpose, “rehabilitation or conservation work” may include:

Carrying out plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings or other improvements;

Acquisition of real property and demolition, removal, or rehabilitation of buildings and improvements thereon where necessary to eliminate unhealthy, unsanitary or unsafe conditions, lessen density, reduce traffic hazards, eliminate obsolete or other uses detrimental to the public welfare, or to otherwise remove or prevent the spread of blight or deterioration, or to provide land for needed public facilities;

Installation, construction, or reconstruction of streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other improvements necessary for carrying out the objectives of the urban renewal project; and

The disposition, for uses in accordance with the objectives of the urban renewal project, of any property or part thereof acquired in the area of such project; provided, that such disposition shall be in the manner prescribed in this part for the disposition of property in a redevelopment project area.

Acts 1955, ch. 181, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-822.

13-20-211. Urban renewal plan.

Any urban renewal project undertaken pursuant to § 13-20-210 shall be undertaken in accordance with an urban renewal plan for the area of the project. As used in this part, “urban renewal plan” means a plan, as it exists from time to time, for an urban renewal project, which plan:

Shall conform to the general plan for the municipality as a whole; and

Shall be sufficiently complete to indicate such land acquisition, demolition and removal of structures, redevelopment, improvements, and rehabilitation as may be proposed to be carried out in the area of the urban renewal project, zoning and planning changes, if any, land uses, maximum densities, building requirements, and the plan's relationship to definite local objectives respecting appropriate land uses, improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities, and other public improvements.

An urban renewal plan shall be prepared and approved pursuant to the same procedure as provided in this part with respect to a redevelopment plan.

Acts 1955, ch. 181, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-823.

13-20-212. Powers of authority — Acquiring property — Bond issues.

An authority has all the powers necessary or convenient to undertake and carry out urban renewal plans and urban renewal projects, including the authority to acquire property by eminent domain or purchase, and to dispose of property, to issue bonds and other obligations, to borrow and accept grants from the federal government or other source and to exercise the other powers which this part confers on an authority with respect to redevelopment projects. In connection with the planning and undertaking of any urban renewal plan or urban renewal project, the authority, the municipality, and all public and private officers, agencies, and bodies have all the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities which they have with respect to a redevelopment plan or redevelopment project, in the same manner as though all of the provisions of this part applicable to a redevelopment plan or redevelopment project were applicable to an urban renewal plan or urban renewal project; provided, that for such purpose, “redevelopment” as used in this part, except in this section and in the definition of “redevelopment project” in § 13-20-202, means “urban renewal”; and provided further, that “slum” and “blighted,” as used in this part, except in this section and in the definitions in § 13-20-201, mean “blighted, deteriorated, or deteriorating.” This section shall not change the corporate name of the authority of the short title of this part or amend any section of this part. In addition to the surveys and plans which an authority is otherwise authorized to make, an authority is hereby specifically authorized to make:

Plans for carrying out a program of voluntary repair and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements; and

Plans for the enforcement of laws, codes, and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements, and to the compulsory repair, rehabilitation, demolition, or removal of buildings and improvements.

The authority is authorized to develop, test, and report methods and techniques, and carry out demonstrations and other activities, for the prevention and the elimination of slums and urban blight.

Whenever the power of eminent domain as herein conferred shall be exercised, in estimating the damages, the jury or jury of view, as the case may be, shall give the value of the land or rights taken without deduction, together with incidental damages, if any. Where the removal of furniture, household belongings, fixtures, merchandise, stock in trade, inventories, equipment or machinery is made necessary by the taking, the reasonable expense of such removal shall be considered in assessing incidental damages. The reasonable expense of the removal of such chattels shall be construed as including the cost of: any necessary disconnection, dismantling or disassembling; the loading and drayage to another location not more than ten (10) miles distant; and the reassembling, reconnecting, and installing in such new location. This provision shall only apply when the power of eminent domain is exercised under this section.

Acts 1955, ch. 181, § 1; 1965, ch. 192, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-824.

Law Reviews.

Eminent Domain — Moving Expense — A Condemnor in Tennessee Is Required to Pay Moving Expense for Fixtures and Chattels Upon Condemnation, 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 205.

13-20-213. Delegation of powers — Bond issues.

Any municipality or other public body is hereby authorized, without limiting any provision in § 13-20-212, to do any and all things necessary to aid and cooperate in the planning and undertaking of an urban renewal project in the area in which such municipality or public body is authorized to act, including the furnishing of such financial and other assistance as the municipality or public body is authorized by this part to furnish for or in connection with a redevelopment plan or redevelopment project.

An authority is hereby authorized to delegate or assign to a municipality or other public body any or all of the powers or functions of the authority with respect to the planning or undertaking of an urban renewal project or projects in the area in which such municipality or public body is authorized to act, and/or to assign, transfer, and/or convey to any such municipality or public body any or all of its rights with respect to or interest in one (1) or more urban renewal projects, and such municipality or public body is hereby authorized to carry out or perform such powers or functions in the place and stead of the authority.

In addition, for a period commencing on May 22, 1984, and ending eighteen (18) months thereafter, an authority is hereby authorized to delegate or assign to a municipality any or all of the powers or functions of the authority with respect to the financing of an urban renewal project or projects, including, but not limited to:

The issuance of bonds or other obligations for any purpose for which the authority could issue its bonds with respect to any such project or projects;

The assumption of any bonds or other obligations of the authority with respect to any such project or projects;

The issuance of bonds or other obligations for the purpose of refunding any bonds or other obligations issued by the authority or issued or assumed by the municipality pursuant to the delegation and assignment of powers herein contained;

The receipt and collection of those tax revenues described in § 13-20-205(a)(2); and

The pledging of such revenues to the payment of principal of and interest on bonds or other obligations issued by the municipality pursuant to such delegation and assignment.

Upon the expiration of a period commencing on May 22, 1984, and ending eighteen (18) months thereafter, an authority shall no longer have the authority granted herein to delegate or assign any powers or functions relative to financing of urban renewal projects, and no municipality shall have the authority granted herein to issue or assume any bonds or obligations; provided, that the expiration of such authorization shall not invalidate or make unenforceable any bonds or other obligations issued or assumed by a municipality pursuant to any such delegation or assignment by an authority, nor impair the authority of a municipality to issue, as set forth herein, bonds or other obligations to refund any bonds or other obligations issued or assumed by the municipality pursuant to such delegation or assignment, nor impair the obligations of contract of a municipality with respect to any outstanding bonds or other obligations issued or assumed by the municipality pursuant to such assignment and delegation, nor impair the authority of a municipality to receive and collect tax revenues described in § 13-20-205(a)(2) and apply any such revenues to the payment of any such bonds or other obligations. This section does not apply in counties with populations greater than eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

The delegation or assignment of any of the powers or functions of an authority with respect to any urban renewal projects, including the delegation of powers or functions relative to financing of urban renewal projects during the period hereinabove described, or the assignment, transfer or conveyance of any such projects as provided herein shall not require an amendment to any existing urban renewal plan or plans adopted in connection with any such project or projects.

Notwithstanding [former] §§ 6-57-301 and 6-57-302 or any other provision of law to the contrary, any bonds or other obligations issued or assumed by any municipality pursuant to the delegation and assignment hereinabove described shall be authorized, issued, and sold in accordance with part 6 of this chapter and secured by and payable from such revenues as provided in part 6 of this chapter, which part shall constitute full, complete, and independent authority for the issuance of such bonds or other obligations by the municipality, as fully and with the same power as the authority could have issued such bonds or obligations; provided, that any bonds or other obligations issued by a municipality to refund any bonds or other obligations, other than bond anticipation notes, issued by the authority or issued or assumed by the municipality pursuant to the delegation and assignment hereinabove set forth shall be issued in accordance with title 9, chapter 21. Notwithstanding § 13-20-601, or any other provision of law to the contrary, any such municipality shall be authorized to secure the bonds or other obligations by pledging its full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power to the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds or obligations.

In the event such pledge of full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the municipality is given, prior to the issuance and sale of any such bonds, the municipality shall comply with title 9, chapter 21.

In the event such pledge of full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the municipality is given, any holder or holders of the bonds or obligations, including a trustee or trustees for holders of such bonds or obligations, shall have the right, in addition to all other rights, by mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce such rights of such holder or holders against the municipality, and the governing body of such municipality and any officer, agent or employee thereof, including, but not limited to, the right to require the municipality and the governing body and any proper officer, agent or employee thereof, to assess, levy and collect taxes and other revenues and charges adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, such taxes, revenues and charges. The taxes herein authorized to be pledged shall be levied without limit as to rate or amount upon all taxable property within the municipality.

Any public body is hereby authorized to enter into agreements, which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary, with any other public body or bodies respecting action to be taken pursuant to any of the powers granted by this part, including the furnishing of funds or other assistance in connection with an urban renewal plan or urban renewal project.

Acts 1955, ch. 181, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-825; Acts 1984, ch. 747, § 2; 1985, ch. 155, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 403, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 332, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1985, ch. 155, § 3 provided that (b)(2) and (c), as codified, were reenacted, revived and reaffirmed in their entirety and amended by chapter 155, and were to be in full force and effect on and after April 8, 1985 until November 22, 1985; and that it was the legislative intent and purpose of chapter 155 to continue the effective period of such provisions and to extend the expiration date of such provisions to November 22, 1985.

Sections 6-57-301 and 6-57-302, referred to in this section, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 10.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

13-20-214. Development of program by municipality — Authorization.

The governing body of the municipality, or such public officer or public body as it may designate, is hereby authorized to prepare a workable program, which may include an official plan of action, as it exists from time to time for effectively dealing with the problem of urban slums and blighted, deteriorated, or deteriorating areas within the community and for the establishment and preservation of a well-planned community with well-organized residential neighborhoods of decent homes and suitable living environment for adequate family life, for utilizing appropriate private and public resources to eliminate, and prevent the development or spread of, slums and urban blight and deterioration, to encourage needed urban rehabilitation, to provide for the redevelopment of blighted, deteriorated, or slum areas, or to undertake such of the aforementioned activities or other feasible activities as may be suitably employed to achieve the objectives of such a program.

Acts 1955, ch. 181, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-826.

13-20-215. Powers are supplemental.

The powers conferred by §§ 13-20-209 — 13-20-215 shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law.

Acts 1955, ch. 181, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-827.

Attorney General Opinions. City development of residential real estate, OAG 98-042, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (2/17/98).

13-20-216. Notice to property owner of proposed acquisition.

Whenever the acquisition of any real property in a designated blighted area is proposed and is predicated solely upon the findings that the structure or structures involved are dilapidated and are in violation of the applicable building and housing codes, the owner of the property shall be notified of the planned acquisition by certified mail to the owner's latest address of record, and the owner shall be accorded a reasonable time, in no case less than ninety (90) days from the date of the notice, to bring the substandard structure into compliance with such codes.

This section shall not apply in any county having a metropolitan form of government or in any county with a population of:

not less than nor more than

6,125 6,225

14,925 14,940

15,675 15,775

56,000 56,100

85,725 85,825

287,700 287,800

700,001

according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1982, ch. 816, §§ 3-7.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

13-20-217. Airport noise mitigation programs.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in addition to those powers specified in this chapter, any municipal housing authority exercising any of the powers specified in this chapter is hereby authorized to enter into cooperative agreements, with any county with a metropolitan form of government which adopts an airport noise mitigation program pursuant to § 7-3-313, to implement or administer the airport noise mitigation program or any portion thereof.

No state funds shall be obligated or expended to implement this section.

Acts 1991, ch. 500, §§ 2, 3.